Massachusetts, session 194th, H859.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, annually, no later
than February 15, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall provide an annual mailing to all
registered voters in the Commonwealth. The mailing shall include: (1) information on how to
request a mail-in or absentee ballot for any election scheduled during that calendar year; and (2)
instructions for submitting a ballot request online, by phone, or by mail.
Section 2. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall not be permitted to send additional
mailings related to ballot requests for individual elections during that calendar year unless
otherwise mandated by federal law.
Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.
of 1